California, session 20252026, AB1786.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The heading of Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 20155) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read: Article 3.7. Best Value Construction Contracting for Counties, Cities, and the San Gabriel Valley Council of GovernmentsSEC. 2. Section 20155 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155. (a) This article provides optional authority for a best value procurement program for construction projects in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for participating counties, cities, and the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments.(b) The governing body of a participating county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall let any contract for a construction project pursuant to this article to the bidder representing the best value or else reject all bids.(c) The bidder may be selected on the basis of the best value to the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments. In order to implement this method of selection, the governing body shall adopt and publish procedures and required criteria that ensure that all selections are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These procedures shall conform to Sections 20155.3 to 20155.6, inclusive.(d) If the governing body deems it to be in the best interest of the participating county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder for a project to execute a tendered contract, the governing body may award it to the bidder with the second lowest best value score, as determined in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 20155.5 and thereafter to the third lowest best value score, if necessary.(e) (1) A county may also use the best value construction contracting method set out in this article to award individual annual contracts, which shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index, for repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according to unit prices. The contracts shall be based on plans and specifications for typical work. No annual contracts may be awarded for any new construction. (2) For purposes of this subdivision, best value criteria shall be applied to the annual contract for construction services, rather than to an individual, specific project. Annual contracts may be extended or renewed for two subsequent annual terms and a maximum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) over the subsequent two terms of the contract. Contract values shall be adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index. (3) For purposes of this subdivision, “unit price” means the amount paid for a single unit of an item of work, and “typical work” means a work description applicable universally or applicable to a large number of individual projects, as distinguished from work specifically described with respect to an individual project. For purposes of this section, “repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according to unit prices” shall not include design or contract drawings. SEC. 3. Section 20155.1 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.1. As used in this article:(a) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the selected bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.(b) “Best value contract” means a competitively bid contract entered into pursuant to this article.(c) “Best value contractor” means a properly licensed person, firm, or corporation that submits a bid for, or is awarded, a best value contract.(d) City means any chartered or general law city.(e) “County” means any chartered or general law county and includes a city and county.(f) “Demonstrated management competency” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity of the proposed management staffing to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.(g) “Financial condition” means the financial resources needed to perform the contract. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s financial condition shall include, at a minimum, capacity to obtain all required payment bonds, performance bonds, and liability insurance.(h) “Labor compliance” means the ability to comply with, and past performance with, contract and statutory requirements for the payment of wages and qualifications of the workforce. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s labor compliance shall include, as a minimum, the bidder’s ability to comply with the apprenticeship requirements of the California Apprenticeship Council and the Department of Industrial Relations, its past conformance with those requirements, and its past conformance with requirements to pay prevailing wages on public works projects.(i) “Qualifications” means the financial condition, relevant experience, demonstrated management competency, labor compliance, and safety record of the bidder, and, if required by the bidding documents, some or all of the preceding qualifications as they pertain to subcontractors proposed to be used by the bidder for designated portions of the work. A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall evaluate financial condition, relevant experience, demonstrated management competency, labor compliance, and safety record, using, to the extent possible, quantifiable measurements.(j) “Relevant experience” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.(k) “Safety record” means the prior history concerning the safe performance of construction contracts. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s safety record shall include, at a minimum, its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period.SEC. 4. Section 20155.3 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.3. A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall proceed in accordance with the following when awarding best value contracts under this article:(a) The county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall not select a bidder on the basis of the best value to a county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments unless, after evaluating at a public meeting the alternative of awarding the contract on the basis of the lowest bid price, the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments makes a written finding that awarding the contract on the basis of best value, for the specific project under consideration, will accomplish one or more of the following objectives: reducing project costs, expediting the completion of the project, or providing features not achievable through awarding the contract on the basis of the lowest bid price.(b) The county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall prepare a solicitation for bids and give notice pursuant to Section 20125. A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments may identify specific types of subcontractors that are required to be included in the bids. A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall comply with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 with regard to construction subcontractors identified in the bid.(c) The county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall establish a procedure to prequalify bidders pursuant to Section 20101. The information required pursuant to this section shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information submitted by the bidder as part of the evaluation process shall not be open to public inspection to the extent that information is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(d) Each solicitation for bids shall do all of the following:(1) Invite prequalified bidders to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by this article.(2) Include a section identifying and describing the following:(A) Criteria that the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments will consider in evaluating bids.(B) The methodology and rating or weighting system that will be used by the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments in evaluating bids.(C) The relative importance or weight assigned to the criteria identified in the request for bids.(e) Final evaluation of the best value contractor shall be done in a manner that prevents cost or price information from being revealed to the committee evaluating the qualifications of the bidders prior to completion and announcement of that committee’s decision.SEC. 5. Section 20155.4 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.4. (a) A best value contractor shall not be prequalified or shortlisted unless the contractor provides an enforceable commitment to the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments that the contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.(b) This section shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:(1) The county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the contractor agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.(2) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments prior to January 1, 2017.(3) The contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the contractor and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.(c) For purposes of this section, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.SEC. 6. Section 20155.5 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.5. Selection of the best value contractor shall be made as follows:(a) (1) An evaluation committee appointed by the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall evaluate the qualifications of the bidders based solely upon the criteria set forth in the solicitation documents, and shall assign a qualifications score to each bid.(2) A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall establish written policies and procedures, consistent with applicable law, to ensure that members of an evaluation committee are free from conflicts of interest, if the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments has not already established applicable written policies and procedures.(b) A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall not award a contract for a construction project pursuant to this article if a solicitation for bids for that construction project results in the submission of fewer than three responsive bids to the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments for evaluation.(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 20155, the award of the contract shall be made to the bidder whose bid is determined by a county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments, in writing, to be the best value to the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments. To determine the best value contractor, the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall divide each bidder’s price by its qualifications score. The lowest resulting cost per quality point will represent the best value bid.(d) A county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall issue a written decision of its contract award.(e) Upon issuance of a contract award, a county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall publicly announce its award identifying the best value contractor to which the award is made, the project, the project price, and the selected best value contractor’s score based on the evaluation criteria listed in the request for bids. The notice of award shall be made public and include the score of the selected best value contractor in relation to all other responsive bidders and their respective prices. The contract file shall include documentation sufficient to support the decision to award.SEC. 7. Section 20155.6 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.6. (a) If a county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments elects to award a project pursuant to this article, retention proceeds withheld by the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments from the selected best value contractor shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.(b) In a contract between the selected best value contractor and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments and the selected best value contractor. If the selected best value contractor provides written notice to a subcontractor that, prior to or at the time the bid is requested, a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the selected best value contractor, then the selected best value contractor may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the county, city, or San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments and the selected best value contractor from any payment made by the selected best value contractor to the subcontractor.SEC. 8. Section 20155.7 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.7. (a) Before March 1, 2031, the governing body of a participating county, city, or the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments shall submit a report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) A description of the projects awarded using the best value procedures.(2) The contract award amounts.(3) The best value contractors awarded the projects.(4) A description of any written protests concerning the solicitation, bid, or award of the contracts and the resolution of those protests.(5) A description of the prequalification process.(6) The criteria used to evaluate the bids, including the weighting of the criteria.(7) If applicable, an assessment of project performance, including delays or cost increases.(c) A report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 9. Section 20155.9 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20155.9. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2040, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 10. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments undertakes complex, multifaceted projects involving public infrastructure, housing development, and community improvements that require specialized statutory treatment.SEC. 10. SEC. 11. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.